District of Columbia statutes.
34-2157

Repealed

Applicability.

Repealed.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 6018, 51 DCR 8441
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 7058, 55 DCR 7598
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6018 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6018 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).